Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
38-136

Examinations; passing score; reexaminations.

(1) In the absence of any specific requirement or provision relating to any
particular profession:

(a) The appropriate board may specify the passing score on credentialing
examinations;

(b) An examinee who fails a credentialing examination may retake the entire
examination or the part failed upon payment of the cost of retaking the
examination; and

(c) The department shall withhold from the credentialing fee submitted by an
examinee the cost of any national examination used when an examinee fails a
credentialing examination and shall return to the examinee the remainder of the
credentialing fee collected subject to section 38-156, except that:

(i) If a state-administered jurisprudence portion of the credentialing
examination was failed, the examinee may retake that portion without charge;
and

(ii) If any component of a national examination was failed, the examinee shall
be charged the cost for retaking such examination.

(2) A person who desires to take an examination but does not wish to receive a
credential may take such examination by meeting the examination eligibility
requirements and paying the cost of the examination.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 31, p. 462;

C.S.1929, § 71-407;

Laws 1939, c. 91, § 4, p. 394;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 71-407;

R.S.1943, § 71-131;

Laws 1969, c. 560, § 3, p. 2279;

Laws 1979, LB 427, § 16;

Laws 1983, LB 476, § 4;

Laws 1984, LB 481, § 14;

Laws 1985, LB 250, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 277, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 38;

Laws 1986, LB 355, § 13;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 30;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 16;

Laws 1988, LB 557, § 19;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 13;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 10;

Laws 1990, LB 1064, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 10;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 21;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 17;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 33;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 8;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 12;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 18;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 111;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-131;

Laws 2007, LB481, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 36.